Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0412

Allocation of voting power of patron members.

(1) The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members on the basis of one or a combination of the following:

(a) One member, one vote;

(b) Use or patronage; or

(c) If a patron member is a cooperative, the number of its patron members.

(2) The organic rules may provide for the allocation of patron member voting power by districts or class, or any combination thereof.

[ 2019 c 37 s 412.]